New Jersey, session 221, A795.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.11A:6-5 is amended to read as follows: 11A:6-5.  Sick leave.  a. Full-time State and political subdivision employees shall receive a sick leave credit of no less than one working day for each completed month of service during the remainder of the first calendar year of service and 15 working days in every year thereafter. Unused sick leave shall accumulate without limit. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the use of six or more consecutive days of accumulated sick leave by an employee in the twelve months prior to retirement in anticipation of that retirement without a medical necessity verified in writing by a physician shall be prohibited.  The board shall promulgate rules and procedures to ensure that verification of medical necessity is provided.  The rules shall provide that the employer may require the employee to submit to an examination by a physician selected by the employer to verify the medical necessity.  The employer shall (1) impose a fine and issue a reprimand against the employee found to be in violation of this prohibition, with the fine to be an amount equivalent to three times the daily rate of compensation for each day of violation, or (2) for a second violation of the prohibition, deduct all sick leave found to have been used in violation of this prohibition from the number of unused accumulated sick leave credited on the effective date of retirement upon which supplemental compensation, if any, for the employee at the time of retirement is calculated, or (3) both. (cf:  N.J.S.11A:6-5) 2.    (New section) Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, for officers or employees of a political subdivision of the State, or any agency, authority or instrumentality thereof, that has not adopted the provisions of Title 11A, Civil Service, of the New Jersey Statutes, the use of six or more consecutive days of accumulated sick leave by an officer or employee in the twelve months prior to retirement in anticipation of that retirement without a medical necessity verified in writing by a physician shall be prohibited.  The governing body of the political subdivision shall promulgate rules and procedures to ensure that verification of medical necessity is provided.  The rules shall provide that the employer may require the officer or employee to submit to an examination by a physician selected by the employer to verify the medical necessity.  The employer shall (1) impose a fine and issue a reprimand against the officer or employee found to be in violation of this prohibition, with the fine to be an amount equivalent to three times the daily rate of compensation for each day of violation, or (2) for a second violation of the prohibition, deduct all sick leave found to have been used in violation of this prohibition from the number of unused accumulated sick leave credited on the effective date of retirement upon which supplemental compensation, if any, for the officer or employee at the time of retirement is calculated, or (3) both. 3.    (New section) Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, for officers or employees of a school board, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, the use of six or more consecutive days of accumulated sick leave by an officer or employee in the twelve months prior to retirement in anticipation of that retirement and without a medical necessity verified in writing by a physician shall be prohibited.  The board shall promulgate rules and procedures to ensure that verification of medical necessity is provided.  The rules shall provide that the employer may require the officer or employee to submit to an examination by a physician selected by the employer to verify the medical necessity.  The employer shall (1) impose a fine and issue a reprimand against the officer or employee found to be in violation of this prohibition, with the fine to be an amount equivalent to three times the daily rate of compensation for each day of violation, or (2) for a second violation of the prohibition, deduct all sick leave found to have been used in violation of this prohibition from the number of unused accumulated sick leave credited on the effective date of retirement upon which supplemental compensation, if any, for the officer or  employee at the time of retirement is calculated, or (3) both. 4.    The provisions of P.L. , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall not be deemed to impair the obligation of a collective bargaining agreement or individual contract of employment in effect on the effective date of P.L.   , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) that provides for relevant discipline procedures or supplemental compensation at retirement for unused accumulated sick leave. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.